Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4611
Administrative order; appeal.

Any owner or operator served with an administrative order of a district may, within thirty days after service of the administrative order, appeal to the district court in the county in which a majority of the land is located. The appeal shall be de novo and shall be conducted in accordance with section 2-4613.

Laws 1986, LB 474, § 11.